Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-708.01
Retired member; reemployment; how treated.

For a member who retired under section 24-708 and becomes employed full-time or part-time as a judge in the state after his or her retirement date, the retired member shall continue receiving retirement benefits, shall be treated as a new judge for all purposes of the Judges Retirement Act, and shall receive service credit only for service commencing from the date of reemployment. Retired judges who are assigned to temporary duty as provided in sections 24-729 to 24-733 shall not become contributing active members in the retirement system and shall not receive any service credits.

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 14.